Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,115
Land surveying; examination of applicants.

The applicant for licensure must pass an examination administered by the examining board which covers generally the matters confronting land surveyors as provided in the rules and bylaws.

Laws 1957, c. 383, § 8, p. 1334;

Laws 1971, LB 442, § 19;

Laws 1984, LB 478, § 3;

Laws 1994, LB 874, § 14;

Laws 2013, LB303, § 2;

Laws 2024, LB102, § 32.
September 1, 2024